New Jersey, session 221, A4790.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes electricity to end users within this State. Power outage means any disruption in service provided by an electric public utility. b.    In the event that there is a power outage, the electric public utility that is responsible for providing the service affected by the power outage shall publish, at a minimum, the following information on the electric public utilitys Internet website about the power outage: (1) the geographic area affected by the power outage; (2) the start time of the power outage; (3) the number of customers affected by the power outage; (4) the number of all other ongoing power outages in the State; (5) the estimated time until restoration of service; and (6) the cause of the power outage once ascertained. c.  The electric public utility shall ensure the information required pursuant on subsection b. of this section is updated regularly until service is restored. d.    The electric public utility shall report the information published on the electric public utilitys Internet website pursuant to subsection b. of this section to the board within 30 days of restoration of electric service after a power outage. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.